Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.400

Provision of water services and facilities—Contract with Canadian corporation.

A city or town contiguous with Canada may contract with a Canadian corporation for the purchase of water and for the construction, purchase, maintenance, and supply of waterworks to furnish the city or town and other areas within its water service area, and inhabitants thereof, and residents of Canada with an ample supply of water.

[ 1999 c 61 s 1.]